Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3002
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Podiatry Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-3003 to 38-3005.02 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1024;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 19.